North Carolina, session 2025, HB859.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 6 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 153A-145.13. Guaranteed income programs prohibited.
Unless expressly authorized by general or local law, a county shall not adopt or enforce any
ordinance, resolution, or policy that has the purpose or effect of making a payment to an
individual under a guaranteed income program. For purposes of this section, the term "guaranteed
income program" means a program under which an individual is issued an unconditional cash
payment on a regular basis to be used for any purpose by the individual. The term does not
include a program under which an individual is required to seek reemployment, perform work,
or attend training as a condition of a cash payment."
SECTION 2. Article 8 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160A-205.8. Guaranteed income programs prohibited.
Unless expressly authorized by general or local law, a city shall not adopt or enforce any
ordinance, resolution, or policy that has the purpose or effect of making a payment to an
individual under a guaranteed income program. For purposes of this section, the term "guaranteed
income program" means a program under which an individual is issued an unconditional cash
payment on a regular basis to be used for any purpose by the individual. The term does not
include a program under which an individual is required to seek reemployment, perform work,
or attend training as a condition of a cash payment."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H859-v-1*